Arkansas, session 2025, SB137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 9, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-9-106. Electronic medical records — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Healthcare provider" means:
(A) An individual who is licensed, certified, or otherwise
authorized by a licensing authority of this state to administer healthcare
services in the ordinary course of his or her business or practice; or
(B) A healthcare facility including without limitation a
hospital, pharmacy, long-term care facility, office of a healthcare
professional, or a hospice facility;
(2) "Medical record" means a patient’s health record, including
without limitation evaluations, diagnoses, prognoses, laboratory reports, X-
rays, prescriptions, and other technical information used in assessing the
patient’s condition, or the pertinent portion of the record relating to a
specific condition or a summary of the record; and
*JMB283*
01/28/2025 8:11:48 AM JMB283

SB137
(3) "Patient" means a person who has received healthcare
services from a healthcare provider.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the contrary, a
healthcare provider may, in its sole discretion, create, maintain, transmit,
receive, and store medical records in an electronic format and may, in its
sole discretion, temporarily or permanently convert records into an
electronic format.
(c)(1) A healthcare provider is not required to maintain separate
tangible copies of electronically stored medical records.
(2) However, the healthcare provider shall maintain
electronically stored medical records in a legible and retrievable form,
including adequate data backup.
(d) This section is subject to all applicable federal laws governing
the security and confidentiality of a patient’s personal health information.
(e) A tangible copy of a medical record reproduced from an
electronically stored record shall be considered an original for purposes of
providing copies to patients or other authorized parties and for introduction
of the medical record into evidence in administrative or court proceedings.
(f)(1) Except as provided otherwise under federal law, upon receiving
a request for a copy of a medical record from a patient or an authorized
person, a healthcare provider shall provide copies of the medical record in
either tangible or electronically stored form.
(2) Except as provided otherwise under federal law, if a
healthcare provider is audited by a health benefit plan, a pharmacy benefit
manager, or a third-party entity involved in health benefits, the auditor
shall accept an electronic version of the medical record in lieu of a
physical medical record.
(g) This section applies to psychiatric, psychological, or other
mental health medical records of a patient.







01/28/2025 8:11:48 AM JMB283